Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,236
Release of animal; liability to owner.

(1) A person who intentionally, willfully, and without permission releases an animal lawfully confined for science, research, commerce, agriculture, or education is liable to the owner of the animal for damages, including the costs of restoring the animal to confinement and to its health condition prior to release and the costs for damage to real property caused by the released animal. If the release causes the failure of an experiment, the person shall also be liable for all costs of repeating the experiment, including replacement of the animals, labor, and materials.

(2) For purposes of this section, animal shall mean any warmblooded or coldblooded animal used in food, fur, or fiber production, agriculture, research, testing, or education and shall include dogs, cats, poultry, fish, and invertebrates.

(3) This section shall not apply to lawful activities of any governmental agency or employees or agents of such agency carrying out their duties prescribed by law.

Laws 1992, LB 312, § 1.